District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-1536

Enforcement.

Repealed.

Feb. 28, 1987, D.C. Law 6-212, § 25, 34 DCR 850
Feb. 5, 1994, D.C. Law 10-68, § 43(a), 40 DCR 6311
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 406(u)(2), 48 DCR 334
1981 Ed., § 47-1536.